Florida, session 2026, SB332.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 19 20 Section 1.âSection 70.90, Florida Statutes, is created to 21 read: 22 70.90âPublic meetings and records regarding a claim under 23 the Bert J. Harris, Jr., Private Property Rights Protection 24 Act.â 25 (1)âA meeting or portion of a meeting between an agency as 26 defined in s. 119.011, or the chief administrative or executive 27 officer of an agency, and the agencyâs attorney during the 90 28 day notice period specified in s. 70.001(4) to discuss claims 29 submitted in accordance with that subsection is exempt from s. 30 286.011 and s. 24(b), Art. I of the State Constitution, provided 31 that: 32 (a)âThe agencyâs attorney shall advise the agency at a 33 public meeting that he or she desires advice concerning a claim 34 submitted in accordance with s. 70.001(4). 35 (b)âThe subject matter of the meeting must be confined to 36 settlement negotiations or strategy sessions relating to a claim 37 submitted in accordance with s. 70.001(4). 38 (c)âThe entire session must be recorded by a certified 39 court reporter. The reporter shall record the times of 40 commencement and termination of the session, all discussion and 41 proceedings, the names of all persons present at any time, and 42 the names of all persons speaking. No portion of the session may 43 be off the record. The court reporterâs notes must be fully 44 transcribed and filed with the agencyâs clerk within a 45 reasonable time after the meeting. 46 (d)âThe agency shall give reasonable public notice of the 47 time and date of the attorney-client session and the names of 48 persons who will be attending the session. The session must 49 commence at an open meeting at which the persons chairing the 50 meeting shall announce the commencement and estimated length of 51 the attorney-client session and the names of the persons 52 attending. At the conclusion of the attorney-client session, the 53 meeting must be reopened, and the person chairing the meeting 54 shall announce the termination of the session. 55 (e)âThe transcript must be made part of the public record 56 upon settlement of a claim under s. 70.001, or upon the 57 expiration of the statute of limitations for the claim arising 58 under this chapter in the event that no litigation is filed and 59 there is no settlement of a claim under s. 70.001. 60 (2)âTranscripts, recordings, minutes, and records generated 61 during an exempt meeting or portion of such a meeting, pursuant 62 to subsection (1), are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), 63 Art. I of the State Constitution. 64 (3)âThis section is subject to the Open Government Sunset 65 Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed 66 on October 2, 2031, unless reviewed and saved from repeal 67 through reenactment by the Legislature. 68 Section 2.â(1)âThe Legislature finds that it is a public 69 necessity that meetings or portions of meetings between an 70 agency as defined in s. 119.011, Florida Statutes, or the chief 71 administrative or executive officer of an agency, and the 72 agencyâs attorney during the 90-day notice period specified in 73 s. 70.001(4), Florida Statutes, to discuss claims submitted in 74 accordance with that subsection be made exempt from s. 286.011, 75 Florida Statutes, and s. 24(b), Article I of the State 76 Constitution, provided that certain conditions are met. When 77 those meetings are conducted in an open meeting, the agency 78 cannot effectively review, discuss, and prepare strategies for 79 resolution of the claim. Similar meetings regarding ongoing 80 litigation are currently confidential. Making these meetings, or 81 portions of these meetings, closed to the public encourages 82 agencies to reasonably develop negotiation strategies that make 83 prelitigation resolution more likely. Requiring meetings 84 relating to a Bert Harris claim to be public defeats the purpose 85 of having a prelitigation claim process, namely, to foster 86 settlement quickly while limiting attorney fees of all parties. 87 The public is protected by the requirement that the records of 88 the meeting be open once the claim is settled. 89 (2)âThe Legislature finds that it is a public necessity 90 that the transcripts, recordings, minutes, and records generated 91 during meetings or portions of meetings between an agency as 92 defined in s. 119.011, Florida Statutes, or the chief 93 administrative or executive officer of an agency, and the 94 agencyâs attorney during the 90-day notice period specified in 95 s. 70.001(4), Florida Statutes, to discuss claims submitted in 96 accordance with that subsection be made exempt from s. 97 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a), Article I of the 98 State Constitution. Release of such information during 99 negotiations or settlement discussions would negate the public 100 meeting exemption. As such, the Legislature finds that the 101 public record exemption is a public necessity. 102 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.